Montana, session 2025, HB388.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

NEW SECTION. Section 1. Definitions. As used in [sections 1 through 4 11], the following
definitions apply:
(1) (a) "Abortion" means the act of using or prescribing an instrument, medicine, or drug or a
substance, device, or means with the intent to terminate the clinically diagnosable pregnancy of a woman and
for the purpose of ensuring the death of her unborn child.
(b) The term does not include an act taken with the intent to:
(i) save the life or preserve the health of the unborn child;
(ii) remove a dead unborn child caused by miscarriage;
(iii) remove an ectopic pregnancy; or
(iv) perform a previability separation procedure when the procedure is, in reasonable medical
judgment, necessary to save or preserve the life of the pregnant woman.
(2) (a) "Abortion-inducing drug" means a medicine, drug, or any other substance prescribed or
dispensed with the intent to terminate the clinically diagnosable pregnancy of a woman and for the purpose of
ensuring the death of her unborn child.
(b) The term includes the off-label use of drugs known to have abortion-inducing properties that
are prescribed specifically with the intent to cause an abortion.
(c) The term does not include drugs that are known to cause an abortion but that are prescribed
for other medical indications.
(3) "CONSUMER" MEANS A NATURAL PERSON WHO IS A MONTANA RESIDENT OR WHOSE HEALTH OR
PERSONAL DATA WAS COLLECTED AT A MEDICAL PREGNANCY CENTER OR PREGNANCY CENTER IN MONTANA

- 2 - Authorized Print Version – HB 388

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB0388.2
(4) "CONSUMER HEALTH DATA" MEANS PERSONAL INFORMATION THAT IS LINKED OR REASONABLY
LINKABLE TO A CONSUMER AND THAT IDENTIFIES THE CONSUMER'S PAST, PRESENT, OR FUTURE PHYSICAL OR MENTAL
HEALTH STATUS. HEALTH STATUS INCLUDES BUT IS NOT LIMITED TO:

(A) INDIVIDUAL HEALTH CONDITIONS, TREATMENT, DISEASES, OR DIAGNOSIS;
(B) SOCIAL, PSYCHOLOGICAL, BEHAVIORAL, AND MEDICAL INTERVENTIONS;
(C) HEALTH-RELATED SURGERIES OR PROCEDURES;
(D) USE OR PURCHASE OF PRESCRIBED MEDICATION;
(E) BODILY FUNCTIONS, VITAL SIGNS, SYMPTOMS, OR MEASUREMENTS;

(F) DIAGNOSES OR DIAGNOSTIC TESTING, TREATMENT, OR MEDICATION;
(G) REPRODUCTIVE OR SEXUAL HEALTH INFORMATION;
(H) BIOMETRIC DATA; AND

(I) GENETIC DATA.
(3) (5) "Contraception" means the use of any natural or artificial means to prevent the fertilization of a
human ovum.
(4) (6) "Ectopic pregnancy" means the state of carrying an unborn child outside of the uterine cavity.
(5) (7) "Medical pregnancy center" means a pregnancy center that provides medical testing,
counseling, and pregnancy-related care.
(6) (8) "Miscarriage" means the spontaneous loss of an unborn child.
(9) "PERSONAL DATA" MEANS ANY INFORMATION THAT IS LINKED OR REASONABLY LINKABLE TO AN
IDENTIFIED OR IDENTIFIABLE INDIVIDUAL. PERSONALLY IDENTIFYING INFORMATION IS PERSONAL DATA AND INCLUDES
PRECISE LOCATION INFORMATION THAT COULD REASONABLY INDICATE A CONSUMER'S ATTEMPT TO ACQUIRE OR RECEIVE
HEALTH SERVICES OR SUPPLIES, DATA THAT IDENTIFIES A CONSUMER SEEKING SERVICES, OR ANY INFORMATION THAT A
MEDICAL PREGNANCY CENTER OR PREGNANCY CENTER, OR PROCESSORS OR AFFILIATES, USES TO IDENTIFY OR
ASSOCIATE A CONSUMER WITH THE DATA THAT IS DERIVED OR EXTRAPOLATED FROM NONHEALTH INFORMATION.
(7) (10) "Pregnancy center" means a private, nonprofit organization that promotes childbirth and
- 3 - Authorized Print Version – HB 388

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB0388.2
alternatives to abortion and provides women, children, and families with resources, counseling, classes,
referrals, and information related to pregnancy, childbearing, adoption, and parenting.
(8) (11) (a) "Previability separation procedure" means a medical procedure performed by a qualified
health care provider to remove an unborn child from the mother's uterine cavity before the stage of fetal
development when, in the reasonable medical judgment of the qualified health care provider based on the
particular facts of the case and in light of the most advanced medical technology and information available,
there is a reasonable likelihood of sustained survival of the unborn child outside the mother's body, with or
without artificial support.
(b) The term does not include an abortion.

NEW SECTION. Section 2. Prohibition on interference with work of pregnancy center. The state
or a local government may not adopt or enact a law, rule, policy, or similar measure that:
(1) requires a pregnancy center to:
(a) offer or perform abortions;
(b) offer, provide, or distribute abortion-inducing drugs or contraception;
(c) refer a patient for an abortion, an abortion-inducing drug, or contraception;
(d) counsel a patient in favor of an abortion, an abortion-inducing drug, or contraception; or
(e) post an advertisement, sign, flyer, or similar material that promotes or provides information
about obtaining an abortion, abortion-inducing drugs, or contraception;
(2) prohibits a pregnancy center from:
(a) providing information, care, counseling, classes, or other services related to pregnancy,
childbirth, or parenting because the pregnancy center does not perform, refer, or counsel in favor of abortion,
abortion-inducing drugs, or contraception;
(b) providing prenatal and postnatal resources, such as diapers, baby clothes, baby furniture,
formula, and similar items, because the pregnancy center does not perform, refer, or counsel in favor of
abortion, abortion-inducing drugs, or contraception;
(c) providing medical testing, counseling, and care related to pregnancy or childbirth because the
pregnancy center does not perform, refer, or counsel in favor of abortion, abortion-inducing drugs, or
- 4 - Authorized Print Version – HB 388

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB0388.2
contraception; or
(d) counseling a woman on pregnancy-related care or treatment, including care or treatment that
may reverse the effects of abortion-inducing drugs; or
(3) interferes with the pregnancy center's staffing or hiring decisions by requiring the pregnancy
center to interview, hire, or continue to employ a person who does not affirm the center's mission statement or
agree to comply with the center's pro-life ethic and operating procedures.

NEW SECTION. SECTION 3. PRIVACY POLICY. (1) MEDICAL PREGNANCY CENTERS AND PREGNANCY
CENTERS SHALL MAINTAIN A CONSUMER HEALTH DATA AND PERSONAL DATA PRIVACY POLICY THAT CLEARLY AND
CONSPICUOUSLY DISCLOSES:

(A) THE CATEGORIES OF PERSONALLY IDENTIFIABLE INFORMATION AND MEDICAL DATA COLLECTED AND THE
PURPOSE FOR WHICH THE DATA IS COLLECTED, INCLUDING HOW THE DATA WILL BE USED;

(B) THE CATEGORIES OF SOURCES FROM WHICH THE DATA IS COLLECTED;

(C) THE CATEGORIES OF THIRD PARTIES AND SPECIFIC AFFILIATES WITH WHOM THE MEDICAL PREGNANCY
CENTER AND PREGNANCY CENTER SHARES THE CONSUMER HEALTH DATA; AND

(D) HOW A CONSUMER MAY EXERCISE THEIR RIGHTS TO PROTECT THIS INFORMATION.
(2) A MEDICAL PREGNANCY CENTER OR A PREGNANCY CENTER SHALL PROMINENTLY PUBLISH A LINK TO ITS
CONSUMER HEALTH DATA PRIVACY POLICY ON ITS HOMEPAGE.

(3) MEDICAL PREGNANCY CENTERS AND PREGNANCY CENTERS SHALL POST A CLEAR STATEMENT THAT
THEIR ENTITY IS NOT CONSIDERED A REGULATED ENTITY UNDER THE HEALTH INSURANCE PORTABILITY AND
ACCOUNTABILITY ACT.

(4) MEDICAL PREGNANCY CENTERS OR PREGNANCY CENTERS MAY NOT COLLECT, USE, OR SHARE
- 5 - Authorized Print Version – HB 388

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB0388.2
ADDITIONAL CATEGORIES OF CONSUMER HEALTH DATA NOT DISCLOSED IN THE POLICY WITHOUT FIRST DISCLOSING THE
ADDITIONAL CATEGORIES AND OBTAINING THE CONSUMER'S AFFIRMATIVE WRITTEN CONSENT PRIOR TO THE COLLECTION,
USE, OR SHARING OF THE CONSUMER HEALTH DATA.

(5) IT IS A VIOLATION OF THIS CHAPTER FOR A MEDICAL PREGNANCY CENTER OR PREGNANCY CENTER TO
CONTRACT WITH A PROCESSOR TO PROCESS CONSUMER HEALTH DATA IN A MANNER THAT IS INCONSISTENT WITH THE
MEDICAL PRIVACY CENTER OR PREGNANCY CENTER CONSUMER DATA PRIVACY POLICY.


NEW SECTION. SECTION 4. CONSENT TO COLLECT AND SHARE INFORMATION REQUIRED. (1) MEDICAL
PREGNANCY CENTERS AND PREGNANCY CENTERS MAY NOT COLLECT ANY CONSUMER HEALTH DATA EXCEPT:

(A) WITH CONSENT FROM THE CONSUMER FOR COLLECTION FOR A SPECIFIC PURPOSE;

(B) TO THE EXTENT NECESSARY TO PROVIDE A PRODUCT OR SERVICE THAT THE CONSUMER HAS
REQUESTED FROM THE MEDICAL PREGNANCY CENTER OR PREGNANCY CENTERS;

(2) MEDICAL PREGNANCY CENTERS OR PREGNANCY CENTERS MAY NOT SHARE ANY CONSUMER HEALTH
DATA EXCEPT:

(A) WITH CONSENT FROM THE CONSUMER FOR SHARING THAT IS SEPARATE AND DISTINCT FROM THE
CONSENT OBTAINED TO COLLECT CONSUMER HEALTH DATA; OR

(B) TO THE EXTENT NECESSARY TO PROVIDE A PRODUCT OR SERVICE THAT THE CONSUMER TO WHOM THE
DATA RELATES HAS REQUESTED.

(3) CONSENT MUST BE OBTAINED PRIOR TO THE COLLECTION OR SHARING OF ANY CONSUMER HEALTH
DATA, AND THE REQUEST FOR CONSENT MUST CLEARLY AND CONSPICUOUSLY DISCLOSE
- 6 - Authorized Print Version – HB 388

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB0388.2
(A) THE CATEGORIES OF CONSUMER HEALTH DATA COLLECTED OR SHARED;

(B) THE PURPOSE OF THE COLLECTION OR SHARING OF THE CONSUMER HEALTH DATA, INCLUDING THE
SPECIFIC WAYS IN WHICH IT WILL BE USED;

(C) THE CATEGORIES OF ENTITIES WITH WHOM THE CONSUMER HEALTH DATA IS SHARED; AND

(D) HOW THE CONSUMER CAN WITHDRAW CONSENT FROM FUTURE COLLECTION OR SHARING OF THE
CONSUMER'S HEALTH DATA.


NEW SECTION. SECTION 5. RIGHT TO REQUEST DATA DELETION. (1) A CONSUMER HAS THE RIGHT TO
CONFIRM WHETHER THE MEDICAL PREGNANCY CENTER OR PREGNANCY CENTER IS COLLECTING, SHARING, OR SELLING
DATA CONCERNING THE CONSUMER AND TO ACCESS THAT DATA, INCLUDING A LIST OF ALL THIRD PARTIES AND
AFFILIATES WITH WHOM THE MEDICAL PREGNANCY CENTER OR PREGNANCY CENTER HAS SHARED OR SOLD THE
CONSUMER DATA AND AN ACTIVE E-MAIL ADDRESS OR OTHER ONLINE MECHANISM THAT THE CONSUMER MAY USE TO
CONTACT THIRD PARTIES.

(2) (A) A CONSUMER HAS THE RIGHT TO WITHDRAW CONSENT FROM THE MEDICAL PREGNANCY CENTER OR
PREGNANCY CENTER'S COLLECTION AND SHARING OF THE CONSUMER'S DATA.

(B) A MEDICAL PREGNANCY CENTER OR PREGNANCY CENTER THAT RECEIVES THE REQUEST TO DELETE
ANY DATA SHALL:

(I) DELETE THE DATA FROM ITS RECORDS, INCLUDING FROM ALL PARTS OF THE CENTER'S NETWORK,
INCLUDING ARCHIVED OR BACKUP SYSTEMS; AND
(II) NOTIFY ALL AFFILIATES, PROCESSORS, CONTRACTORS, AND OTHER THIRD PARTIES WITH WHOM THE
CENTER HAS SHARED CONSUMER HEALTH DATA OF THE DELETION REQUEST.
- 7 - Authorized Print Version – HB 388

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB0388.2

(C) ALL AFFILIATES, PROCESSORS, CONTRACTORS, AND OTHER THIRD PARTIES WITH WHOM MEDICAL
PREGNANCY CENTERS OR PREGNANCY CENTERS HAVE SHARED DATA SHALL HONOR THE CONSUMER'S DELETION
REQUEST AND DELETE THE DATA FROM ITS RECORDS.

(D) A CONSUMER MAY EXERCISE THESE RIGHTS BY SUBMITTING A WRITTEN REQUEST TO THE MEDICAL
PREGNANCY CENTER OR PREGNANCY CENTER. THE CENTER MAY NOT REQUIRE THE CONSUMER TO PAY TO DELETE THE
INFORMATION OR TO SET UP AN ONLINE ACCOUNT OR REQUEST ADDITIONAL PERSONAL INFORMATION TO GET THE
INFORMATION DELETED.

(E) THE MEDICAL PREGNANCY CENTER OR PREGNANCY CENTER SHALL COMPLETE REMOVAL WITHIN 45
DAYS OF THE REQUEST.

(F) THE MEDICAL PREGNANCY CENTER OR PREGNANCY CENTER MAY NOT UNLAWFULLY DISCRIMINATE
AGAINST A CONSUMER FOR EXERCISING ANY RIGHT TO REMOVE INFORMATION.

NEW SECTION. SECTION 6. DATA SECURITY. (1) MEDICAL PREGNANCY CENTERS OR PREGNANCY CENTERS
SHALL RESTRICT ACCESS TO CONSUMER HEALTH DATA BY THE EMPLOYEES, PROCESSORS, AND CONTRACTORS OF THE
REGULATED ENTITY TO ONLY THOSE NECESSARY TO SERVE THE CONSUMER.

(2) MEDICAL PREGNANCY CENTERS OR PREGNANCY CENTERS SHALL ESTABLISH, IMPLEMENT, AND
MAINTAIN ADMINISTRATIVE, TECHNICAL, AND PHYSICAL DATA SECURITY PRACTICES THAT, AT A MINIMUM, SATISFY
REASONABLE STANDARDS OF CARE WITHIN THE INDUSTRY.

NEW SECTION. SECTION 7. SALE OF DATA WITHOUT CONSENT PROHIBITED. (1) IT IS UNLAWFUL FOR A
MEDICAL PREGNANCY CENTER OR PREGNANCY CENTER TO SELL OR OFFER TO SELL CONSUMER HEALTH DATA OR
PERSONAL DATA WITHOUT VALID AUTHORIZATION FROM THE CONSUMER.

- 8 - Authorized Print Version – HB 388

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB0388.2
(2) A CONSUMER AUTHORIZATION FORM MUST BE WRITTEN IN PLAIN LANGUAGE AND MUST, AT MINIMUM,
INCLUDE:

(A) THE SPECIFIC DATA THAT THE CENTER INTENDS TO SELL:
(B) THE NAME AND CONTACT INFORMATION OF THE SELLER:
(C) THE NAME AND CONTACT INFORMATION OF THE PURCHASER; AND
(D) A DESCRIPTION OF THE PURPOSE OF THE SALE.

NEW SECTION. SECTION 8. DISCLAIMER. [SECTIONS 1 THROUGH 11] DO NOT APPLY TO THE HEALTH CARE
ENTITIES ALREADY GOVERNED BY THE HEALTH INSURANCE PORTABILITY AND ACCOUNTABILITY ACT, AND TITLE 50,
CHAPTER 16.

NEW SECTION. SECTION 9. RIGHT OF ACTION. A PERSON HARMED BY A VIOLATION OF [SECTIONS 1
THROUGH 11] MAY BRING A CAUSE OF ACTION AGAINST A MEDICAL PREGNANCY CENTER OR PREGNANCY CENTER FOR
INJUNCTIVE RELIEF, MONETARY DAMAGES, REASONABLE ATTORNEY FEES AND COSTS, AND ANY OTHER APPROPRIATE
RELIEF.


NEW SECTION. Section 10. Legal remedies -- damages. (1) A pregnancy center or a party
aggrieved by a violation of [section 2] may commence a civil action for damages, declaratory relief, injunctive
relief, and any other appropriate relief.
(2) On a finding of a violation of [section 2], the prevailing party is entitled to recover actual
damages or statutory damages of $50,000, whichever is greater, plus attorney fees and costs. If the person
acted with malice, the court may award treble actual damages or treble statutory damages, whichever is
greater.
(3) Damages awarded under this section are cumulative and are not limited by other remedies that
may be available under federal or state law.

- 9 - Authorized Print Version – HB 388

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB0388.2
NEW SECTION. Section 11. Right of intervention. The legislature, by joint resolution, may appoint
one or more of its members who sponsored or cosponsored [sections 1 through 4 11] in the member's official
capacity to intervene as a matter of right in a case in which the constitutionality of this part [SECTIONS 1 THROUGH
11] is challenged.

NEW SECTION. Section 12. Codification instruction. [Sections 1 through 4 11] are intended to be
codified as a new part in Title 50, chapter 4, and the provisions of Title 50, chapter 4, apply to [sections 1
through 4 11].

NEW SECTION. Section 13. Severability. If a part of [this act] is invalid, all valid parts that are
severable from the invalid part remain in effect. If a part of [this act] is invalid in one or more of its applications,
the part remains in effect in all valid applications that are severable from the invalid applications.

NEW SECTION. Section 14. Effective date. [This act] is effective on passage and approval.
- END -
- 10 - Authorized Print Version – HB 388